Missouri, session 2026, HB1691.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 301.155, to read as follows:
301.155. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, farm vehicles,
as defined in section 302.700, and any motor vehicle registered with a gross vehicle
weight rating (GVWR) of 26,001 pounds or greater, that are eligible for registration
under this chapter may, at the option of the registrant, be registered permanently upon
the payment of seven times the applicable fees required to register the vehicle annually
and presentation of all documentation otherwise required by law to register the vehicle
annually.
2. The permanent plate or plates and registration fees are vehicle specific. The
plate or plates and the registration fees paid are nontransferable and nonrefundable,
except those covered under the provisions of section 301.442. Upon the transfer of the
title to any vehicle registered in accordance with this section, the registration shall be
canceled and the license plates issued therefor shall be returned to the director of
revenue.
3. As used in this section, the term "fees" shall include:
(1) Fees for registering the vehicle in accordance with this chapter;
(2) Emblem use authorization fees, contributions, or donations as specified in
this chapter for the issuance of special license plates, which shall be paid to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1691 2
organization issuing the emblem use authorization statement for the plate or plates
unless otherwise specified by law; and
(3) Fees collected as compensation for department of revenue fee offices under
section 136.055, which shall be paid to the fee office. Fee offices are hereby authorized
to collect a fee as compensation in full and for all services rendered, on the basis
specified in this section.
4. The department of revenue may issue a distinctive registration tab or tabs
indicating a vehicle has been permanently registered as specified in this section.
5. The department of revenue may promulgate rules as necessary for the
implementation of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔